src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/hu-hu-g2_exceptions.cti
#words, with not need abbreviate anything
always bonyolultabbal 12-135-1246-135-123-136-123-2345-1-12-12-1-123
word szívvel 156-34-1236-1236-15-123
word érrel 16-1235-1235-15-123
#endword érrel =
always könyvel 13-12345-1246-1236-15-123
always könnyel 13-12345-1246-1246-15-123
always kedvel =
word keddel =
word orral =
always nevel =
always növel =
always szaval 156-1-1236-1-123
always széjjel 156-16-245-245-15-123
word reggel =
always harmadannyi 125-1-1235-134-1-145-1-1246-1246-24
always huszadannyi 125-136-156-1-145-1-1246-1246-24
always százannyi 156-4-126-1-1246-1246-24
always boldogasszony 12-135-123-145-135-1245-1-156-156-135-1246
always mennyi 134-15-1246-1246-24
always szennyirodal 156-15-1246-1246-24-1235-135-145-1-123
always sróforr =
always beforr =
always foszforral 124-135-156-124-135-1235-1235-1-123
always brókeres =
always fiákeres =
always gyökeres 1456-12345-13-15-1235-15-234
always pacemakeres =
always pókeres =
always sikeres =
always szekeres 156-15-13-15-1235-15-234
always programindító =
always rámindul =
always számindex 156-4-134-24-1345-145-15-1346
always vitamindús =
always mindszenti 134-24-1345-145-156-15-1345-2345-24
always albumint =
always amphetamint =
always benjámint =
always filmintézet 124-24-123-134-24-1345-2345-16-126-15-2345
always glutamint =
always gyámintézet 1456-4-134-24-1345-2345-16-126-15-2345
always jázmint 245-4-126-134-24-1345-2345
always minta =
always mintá =
always villáminterjú =
always vitamint =
always villámolvasás =
always villámolvasni =
always fürössze 124-12356-1235-12345-156-156-15
always szösszenet 156-12345-156-156-15-1345-15-2345
always kupont =
always naponta =
always pompont =
always pontifex 1234-135-1345-2345-24-124-15-1346
always pontifexszel 1234-135-1345-2345-24-124-15-1346-1236
always pontonh 1234-135-1345-2345-135-1345-125
always sampont =
always spontaneitás =
always spontaneitással 234-1234-135-1345-2345-1-1345-15-24-2345-4-234-1236
always spontán =
always tampont =
always szabadka 156-1-12-1-145-13-1
always szabadká 156-1-12-1-145-13-4
always voltaire =
always hisztamint 125-24-156-2345-1-134-24-1345-2345
always tanulással 2345-1-1345-136-123-4-234-1236
always szerben 156-15-1235-12-15-1345
always verében =
always gereben =
always seben =
always zseben 345-15-12-15-1345
always különben =
always hasában =
always véreben =
always eben =
always szível 156-34-1236-15-123
always lebben =
always libben =
always rebben =
word áthoz 4-2345-125-135-126
word éhez 16-125-15-126
word kolhoz 13-135-123-125-135-126
word behoz 12-15-125-135-126
word elhoz 15-123-125-135-126
word felhoz 124-15-123-125-135-126
word idehoz 24-145-15-125-135-126
word kihoz 13-24-125-135-126
word lehoz 123-15-125-135-126
word meghoz 134-15-1245-125-135-126
word odahoz 135-145-1-125-135-126
word összehoz 12345-15-125-135-126
word rához 1235-4-125-135-126
word reához 1235-15-4-125-135-126
word széthoz 156-16-2345-125-135-126
word visszahoz 1236-24-156-156-1-125-135-126
always érvel 16-1235-1236-15-123
always amelyik 1-134-15-456-24-13
always amelynek 1-134-15-456-1345-15-13
always amelyre 1-134-15-456-1235-15
always nyelvel 1246-15-123-1236-15-123
always éjjel =
always jászboldogház 245-4-156-12-135-123-145-135-1245-125-4-126
always zalaboldog 126-1-123-1-12-135-123-145-135-1245
always stimmel =
begword szabadal 156-1-12-1-145-1-123
always tavasszal 2345-1-1236-1-156-156-1-123
always nappal 1345-1-1234-1234-1-123
always boldogfalv =
begword boldogház 12-135-123-145-135-1245-125-4-126
always boldog-hegyi 12-135-123-145-135-1245-36-125-15-1456-24
word boldogi 12-135-123-145-135-1245-24
word boldogiak =
always boldogkő =
always boldog-liget =
always boldogon =
always boldog-szigetek 12-135-123-145-135-1245-36-156-24-1245-15-2345-15-13
